Maryland, session 2026, SB0957.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0957*

SENATE BILL 957
Article – Education
6–1001.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Career ladder” means the career ladder for public prekindergarten, primary,
or secondary school teachers in the State implemented by county boards that meets the
standards set forth under this subtitle and the standards adopted by the Department.
(c) “NBC” means National Board Certification issued by the National Board for
Professional Teaching Standards.
(d) “NBC teacher” means a teacher who holds an active National Board
Certification.
(e) (1) “Teacher” means a certified public school employee who is primarily
responsible and accountable for teaching the students in the class.
(2) “Teacher” does not include, unless otherwise provided:
(i) Curriculum specialists;
(ii) Instructional aides;
(iii) Attendance personnel;
(iv) Psychologists;
(v) Social workers;
(vi) Clerical personnel;
(vii) An individual with a Resident Teacher Certificate; or
(viii) An individual with a certification for career professionals.
6–1009.
(a) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, beginning on July 1, 2022,
teacher salary increases associated with the career ladder shall at a minimum include the
following:
(i) Becoming an NBC teacher – $10,000 salary increase;
(ii) An NBC teacher teaching at a low–performing school as
identified by the county board – $7,000 salary increase;

SENATE BILL 957 3
(iii) Becoming lead teacher – $5,000 salary increase;
(iv) Becoming distinguished teacher – $10,000 salary increase;
(v) Becoming professor distinguished teacher – $15,000 salary
increase; and
(vi) Becoming a distinguished principal – $15,000 salary increase.
(2) The teacher salary increases under paragraph (1) of this subsection do
not apply to paragraph (1)(iii) through (vi) of this subsection until § 6–1002(a) of this
subtitle becomes effective as recommended by the Department and approved by the
Accountability and Implementation Board.
(b) (1) IN THIS SUBSECTION, “10–YEAR NBC” MEANS AN NBC AWARDED
TO A TEACHER ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31, 2021, THAT:
(I) HAS AN EXPIRATION DATE WAS RENEWED BETWEEN
JANUARY 1, 2016, AND DECEMBER 31, 2031 2021, INCLUSIVE; AND
(II) HAS A 10–YEAR AWARD PERIOD;
(III) WAS SUBJECT TO THE RENEWAL PROCESS FOR RETENTION
OF CERTIFICATION; AND
(IV) PROHIBITS THE HOLDER FROM USING THE MAINTENANCE
OF CERTIFICATION PROCESS FOR RETENTION OF CERTIFICATION UNTIL THE
10–YEAR AWARD PERIOD HAS EXPIRED.
(2) Salary increases associated with maintenance of an NBC OR RENEWAL
OF A 10–YEAR NBC are subject to collective bargaining in accordance with § 6–408 of this
title.
[(2)] (3) The State share for the following salary increases provided under
paragraph [(1)] (2) of this subsection shall not exceed the following amounts:
(i) FOR AN NBC THAT HAS A 5–YEAR AWARD PERIOD EXCEPT
AS PROVIDED IN ITEM (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH:
1. Earning a first maintenance of NBC – $8,000 salary
increase;
[(ii)] 2. Earning a second maintenance of NBC – $7,000 salary
increase; and

SENATE BILL 957
[(iii)] 3. Earning a third maintenance of NBC – $6,000 salary
increase; AND
(II) FOR A 10–YEAR NBC:
1. EARNED 5 YEARS AFTER EARNING RENEWAL OF A
10–YEAR NBC (FIRST MAINTENANCE OF NBC) – $8,000 SALARY INCREASE;
2. EARNING A FIRST MAINTENANCE OF A 10–YEAR NBC
AFTER 5 YEARS FROM THE DATE OF RENEWAL MAINTENANCE OF CERTIFICATION
THAT BEGINS A 5–YEAR AWARD PERIOD (SECOND MAINTENANCE OF NBC) – $7,000
SALARY INCREASE; AND
3. EARNING A SECOND MAINTENANCE OF A 10–YEAR
NBC MAINTENANCE OF CERTIFICATION (THIRD MAINTENANCE OF NBC) – $6,000
SALARY INCREASE.
(c) (1) If a teacher is eligible for more than one salary increase under
subsections (a) and (b) of this section, the teacher shall receive all salary increases that
apply.
(2) A teacher that receives a salary increase under subsection (a)(2) of this
section for teaching at a low–performing school may not lose that salary increase while
teaching at the school even if the school ceases to be low–performing.
(d) On or before July 1, 2024, each county shall demonstrate to the Accountability
and Implementation Board established under § 5–402 of this article that, during the period
between July 1, 2019, and June 30, 2024, teachers in the county received a 10% salary
increase above the negotiated schedule of salary increases between the public school
employer and exclusive representative for the employee organization.
(e) Beginning on July 1, 2026, the minimum teacher salary for all teachers shall
be $60,000.
(f) (1) In this subsection, “total program amount” means the sum of, for each
item under subsections (a) and [(b)(2)] (B)(3) of this section:
(i) The teacher salary increase multiplied by the number of teachers
receiving the salary increase; and
(ii) Rounded to the nearest whole dollar.

SENATE BILL 957 5
(2) The increase in the salary required under subsections (a) and [(b)(2)]
(B)(3) of this section shall be a shared cost between the State and the county in accordance
with this subsection.
(3) The required State share for each county is the result of the following
calculation multiplied by 0.5 and rounded to the nearest whole dollar:
(i) The salary increase multiplied by the number of teachers eligible
to receive the salary increase in the prior fiscal year;
(ii) Divide the result calculated under item (i) of this paragraph by
the ratio, rounded to seven decimal places, of local wealth per pupil to statewide wealth per
pupil as defined in § 5–201 of this article; and
(iii) Multiply the result calculated under item (ii) of this paragraph
by the result, rounded to seven decimal places, that results from dividing the total program
amount by the sum of all of the results calculated under item (ii) of this paragraph for all
counties.
(4) The required local share is equal to the total program amount for each
county minus the State share calculated under paragraph (3) of this subsection and
rounded to the nearest whole dollar.
(g) (1) Beginning in fiscal year 2023, the State shall distribute the State share
of the teacher salary increases as calculated under subsection (f) of this section to each
county board.
(2) Beginning in fiscal year 2023, the county shall distribute the local share
of the teacher salary increases as calculated under subsection (f) of this section to each
county board.
(3) Beginning in fiscal year 2023, the county board shall distribute the
State and the local share of the teacher salary increase to the school in which the teacher
works.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall be construed to
apply retroactively and shall be applied to and interpreted to affect any teacher salary
increases associated with the career ladder for teachers holding a National Board
Certificate under § 6–1009 of the Education Article on or before July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.